Massachusetts, session 194th, S1833.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (r) of section 4 of chapter 32 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 379 and 380, the following words as
a public school teacher or public school guidance counselor and inserting in place thereof the
following words:- as a qualified commonwealth employee.
of 1